District of Columbia statutes.
50-1215

False statements as to liens; violations of law chapter.

Any person intentionally making a false statement with respect to liens in an application for a certificate, or wilfully violating any of the provisions of this chapter, shall upon conviction be punished by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or be imprisoned for not more than 1 year, or both. Prosecutions for violations of this chapter shall be by the Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia or any of his assistants, in the name of the District of Columbia.

July 2, 1940, 54 Stat. 739, ch. 527, § 14
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-279,§ 201(i), 54 DCR 903
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 265, 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 40-1015.
1973 Ed., § 40-714.
D.C. Law 16-279, increased the fine for violation of the section from not more than $500 to not more than $5,000.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “of not more than $5,000”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 265 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.